Utah statutes.
35A-9-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Cycle of poverty" or "poverty cycle" means the set of factors or events by which the long-term poverty of a person is likely to continue and be experienced by each child of the person when the child becomes an adult unless there is outside intervention.

(2) (a)  "Intergenerational poverty" means poverty in which two or more successive generations of a family continue in the cycle of poverty and government dependance.

(b)  "Intergenerational poverty" does not include situational poverty.

(3)  "Poverty" means the state of a person who lacks a usual or socially acceptable amount of money or material possessions as demonstrated by the person's income level being at or below the United States poverty level as defined by the most recently revised poverty income guidelines published by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in the Federal Register.

(4)  "Situational poverty" means temporary poverty that:

(a)  is generally traceable to a specific incident or time period within the lifetime of a person; and

(b)  is not continued to the next generation.

